Vermont statutes. Title 23 Motor Vehicles
Subchapter 1. General Provisions

§ 601.
License required.

Except as otherwise provided by law, a resident shall not operate a motor vehicle on a highway in Vermont unless he or she holds a valid license issued by the State of Vermont. A new resident who has moved into the State from another jurisdiction and who holds a valid license to operate motor vehicles under section 208 of this title shall procure a Vermont license within 60 days of moving to the State. Except as provided in subsection 603(d) of this title, licenses shall not be issued to nonresidents.
(a) (1) Except as otherwise provided by law, a resident shall not operate a motor vehicle on a highway in Vermont unless he or she holds a valid license issued by the State of Vermont. A new resident who has moved into the State from another jurisdiction and who holds a valid license to operate motor vehicles under section 208 of this title shall procure a Vermont license within 60 days of moving to the State. Except as provided in subsection 603(d) of this title, licenses shall not be issued to nonresidents.

In addition to any other requirement of law, a nonresident as defined in section 4 of this title shall not operate a motor vehicle on a Vermont highway unless:

he or she holds a valid license or permit to operate a motor vehicle issued by another U.S. jurisdiction; or

he or she holds a valid license or permit to operate a motor vehicle from a jurisdiction outside the United States and:

is at least 18 years of age, is lawfully present in the United States, and has been in the United States for not more than one year; and

he or she possesses an international driving permit.

All operator’s licenses issued under this chapter shall expire, unless earlier cancelled, at midnight on the eve of the second or fourth anniversary of the date of birth of the license holder following the date of issue. Renewed licenses shall expire at midnight on the eve of the second or fourth anniversary of the date of birth of the license holder following the date the renewed license expired. All junior operator’s licenses shall expire, unless earlier cancelled, at midnight on the eve of the second anniversary of the date of birth of the license holder following the date of issue. A person born on February 29 shall, for the purposes of this section, be considered as born on March 1.

At least 30 days before a license is scheduled to expire, the Commissioner shall mail first class to the licensee or send the licensee electronically an application for renewal of the license; a cardholder shall be sent the renewal notice by mail unless the cardholder opts in to receive electronic notification. A person shall not operate a motor vehicle unless properly licensed.

The Commissioner may, in his or her discretion, determine that certain types of motor vehicles require that an operator possess specialized skill or knowledge to operate those vehicles so that the public safety may not be endangered. If the Commissioner so determines, he or she may prescribe different classes of licenses for the operation of particular types of vehicles. The Commissioner is authorized to make rules prescribing forms and procedures for applications, license classifications, restrictions, endorsements, examinations, driver training requirements, and disqualifications consistent with this title as necessary to carry out the provisions of this section.

A motor-driven cycle may be operated only by a licensed driver at least 16 years of age.

Operators of autocycles shall be exempt from the requirements to obtain a motorcycle learner’s permit or a motorcycle endorsement. The Commissioner shall offer operators of three-wheeled motorcycles that are not autocycles the opportunity to obtain a motorcycle endorsement that authorizes the operation of three-wheeled motorcycles only.

A person who violates this section commits a traffic violation, except that a person who violates this section after a previous conviction under this section within the prior two years shall be subject to imprisonment for not more than 60 days or a fine of not more than $5,000.00, or both. An unsworn printout of the person’s Vermont motor vehicle conviction history may be admitted into evidence to prove a prior conviction under this section.

HISTORY:

Amended

1966, No. 38

(Sp. Sess.), § 1;

1967, No. 86

, § 1;

1977, No. 20

, § 10;

1981, No. 130

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

1989, No. 51

, § 34;

1989, No. 239

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

1991, No. 88

, § 2;

2003, No. 56

, § 71, eff. June 4, 2003;

2003, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

2005, No. 188

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

2007, No. 153

(Adj. Sess.), § 40;

2007, No. 188

(Adj. Sess.), § 5;

2009, No. 152

(Adj. Sess.), § 19e, eff. Sept. 1, 2010;

2013, No. 189

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 33, 35;

2015, No. 147

(Adj. Sess.), § 17;

2015, No. 158

(Adj. Sess.), § 63;

2017, No. 71

, § 10, eff. June 8, 2017;

2017, No. 206

(Adj. Sess.), § 17;

2019, No. 60

, §§ 8, 13.

§ 602.
Exceptions for farm tractors and highway equipment.

No person may operate a farm tractor or motorized highway building equipment upon a public highway without first procuring from the Commissioner of Motor Vehicles a license to operate motor vehicles, except that a person may operate a farm tractor upon a public highway in going to and from different parts of the farm of the owner of the farm tractor without obtaining a license.

Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, a person operating a farm tractor upon the public highways in going to and from different parts of the farm of the owner of the farm tractor or a person operating motorized highway building equipment upon the public highways within a construction area under the provisions of this section is subject to sections 602, 602a, 674, 1007, 1071, 1091, 1094, 1095, 1125, 1126, 1127, and 1201-1210 of this title.

A person operating a farm tractor upon the public highways, except when going to and from different parts of the farm of the owner of the farm tractor, or a person operating motorized highway building equipment upon the public highways outside a construction area, is, while so operating, subject to all of the provisions of this title.

HISTORY:

Amended

1967, No. 361

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

1971, No. 258

(Adj. Sess.), § 5, eff. March 1, 1973;

2001, No. 139

(Adj. Sess.), § 7.

§ 602a.
Age requirement.

A person 12 years of age or older may operate a farm tractor under the provisions of section 602 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 361

(Adj. Sess.), § 2.

§ 603.
Application for and issuance of license.

The Commissioner or his or her authorized agent may license operators and junior operators when an application, on a form prescribed by the Commissioner, signed and sworn to by the applicant for the license, is filed with him or her, accompanied by the required license fee and any valid license from another state or Canadian jurisdiction is surrendered.
(a) (1) The Commissioner or his or her authorized agent may license operators and junior operators when an application, on a form prescribed by the Commissioner, signed and sworn to by the applicant for the license, is filed with him or her, accompanied by the required license fee and any valid license from another state or Canadian jurisdiction is surrendered.

The Commissioner may, however, in his or her discretion, refuse to issue a license to any person whenever he or she is satisfied from information given him or her by credible persons, and upon investigation, that the person is mentally or physically unfit or, because of his or her habits or record as to crashes or convictions, is unsafe to be trusted with the operation of motor vehicles. A person refused a license under the provisions of this subsection shall be entitled to hearing as provided in sections 105-107 of this title.

Any new or renewal application form shall include a space for the applicant to request that a “veteran” designation be placed on his or her license certificate. An applicant who requests the designation shall provide a Department of Defense Form 214 or other proof of veteran status specified by the Commissioner.

Any new or renewal application form shall provide for and request the information required in

17 V.S.A. § 2145a

.

Before issuing an operator’s license, junior operator’s license, or learner’s permit to an applicant, the Commissioner shall obtain driving record information through the National Driver Register and from each state in which the person has been licensed or has been issued a learner’s permit.

An operator’s license, junior operator’s license, or learner’s permit shall not be issued to an applicant whose license, learner’s permit, or privilege to operate is suspended, revoked, or canceled in any jurisdiction.

Except as provided in subsection (e) of this section:

A citizen of a foreign country shall produce his or her passport and visa, alien registration receipt card (green card), or other proof of legal presence for inspection and copying as a part of the application process for an operator’s license, junior operator’s license, or learner’s permit.

An operator’s license, junior operator’s license, or learner’s permit issued to a citizen of a foreign country shall expire coincidentally with his or her authorized duration of stay.

A citizen of a foreign country unable to establish legal presence in the United States who furnishes reliable proof of Vermont residence and of name, date of birth, and place of birth, and who satisfies all other requirements of this chapter for obtaining a license or permit, shall be eligible to obtain an operator’s privilege card, a junior operator’s privilege card, or a learner’s privilege card.
(e) (1) A citizen of a foreign country unable to establish legal presence in the United States who furnishes reliable proof of Vermont residence and of name, date of birth, and place of birth, and who satisfies all other requirements of this chapter for obtaining a license or permit, shall be eligible to obtain an operator’s privilege card, a junior operator’s privilege card, or a learner’s privilege card.

The Commissioner shall require applicants under this subsection to furnish a document or a combination of documents that reliably proves the applicant’s name, date of birth, and place of birth. The Commissioner may prescribe the documents or combination of documents that meets these criteria. However, the Commissioner shall accept a combination of two or more of the following documents to establish the name, date of birth, and place of birth of an applicant:

a valid foreign passport, with or without a U.S. Customs and Border Protection entry form or stamp;

a valid consular identification document issued by the government of Mexico or of Guatemala or by any other government with comparable security standards and protocols, as determined by the Commissioner;

a certified record of the applicant’s birth, marriage, adoption, or divorce, including a translation if necessary.

The Commissioner shall require applicants under this subsection to furnish a document or a combination of documents that reliably proves the applicant’s Vermont residence. The Commissioner may prescribe the documents or combination of documents that meets these criteria. However, the Commissioner shall accept the following combinations of documents as proof of Vermont residence:

two pieces of mail received by the applicant within the prior 30 days with the applicant’s current name and residential Vermont address; and
(A) (i) two pieces of mail received by the applicant within the prior 30 days with the applicant’s current name and residential Vermont address; and

at least one of the documents specified in subdivision (B) of this subdivision (3); or

two of the following that show name and residential Vermont address:

a vehicle title or registration;

a document issued by a financial institution, such as a bank statement;

a document issued by an insurance company or agent, such as an insurance card, binder, or bill;

a document issued by an educational institution, such as a transcript, report card, or enrollment confirmation;

federal tax documents, such as W-2 or 1099 forms;

State tax documents, such as an IN-111; and

medical health records, receipts, or bills.

Persons able to establish lawful presence in the United States but who otherwise fail to comply with the requirements of the REAL ID Act of 2005, Pub. L. No. 109-13, §§ 201-202, shall be eligible for an operator’s privilege card, a junior operator’s privilege card, or a learner’s privilege card, provided the applicant furnishes reliable proof of Vermont residence and of name, date of birth, and place of birth, and satisfies all other requirements of this chapter for obtaining a license or permit. The Commissioner shall require applicants under this subsection to furnish a document or a combination of documents that reliably proves the applicant’s Vermont residence and his or her name, date of birth, and place of birth.

The Commissioner may adopt policies or rules related to the issuance of privilege cards under this section that balance accessibility with mechanisms to prevent fraud. The Commissioner shall consider adopting the appointment system procedures used in other states to prevent and deter fraud with regard to proof of residency.

A privilege card issued under this section shall:

on its face bear the phrase “privilege card” and text indicating that it is not valid for federal identification or official purposes; and

expire at midnight on the eve of the second birthday of the applicant following the date of issuance or, at the option of an applicant for an operator’s privilege card and upon payment of the required four-year fee, at midnight on the eve of the fourth birthday of the applicant following the date of issuance.

Every applicant for or holder of a privilege card under this section shall be subject to all of the provisions of this title that apply to applicants and holders of operator’s licenses, junior operator’s licenses, and learner permits, except where the context clearly requires otherwise.

HISTORY:

Amended

1987, No. 62

, § 3;

1989, No. 84

, § 4;

1995, No. 70

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Feb. 14, 1996;

1997, No. 55

, § 6, eff. June 26, 1997;

2003, No. 109

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

2003, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 16;

2007, No. 61

, § 5;

2011, No. 46

, § 5, eff. Jan. 1, 2012;

2013, No. 57

, § 14;

2013, No. 74

, § 1, eff. Jan. 1, 2014;

2013, No. 189

(Adj. Sess.), § 8;

2015, No. 80

(Adj. Sess.), § 5, eff. July 1, 2017;

2015, No. 158

(Adj. Sess.), § 80;

2017, No. 71

, § 9, eff. June 8, 2017;

2017, No. 71

, § 10.

§ 604.
Repealed.
1977, No. 118 (Adj. Sess.), § 12, eff. Feb. 3, 1978.

§ 605.
Repealed. 2015, No. 158 (Adj. Sess.), § 78(3).

§ 606.
Age limit.

An operator’s license shall not be issued to any person under 18 years of age. Any person who has previously held a junior operator’s license in Vermont prior to application for a license under this section shall have held that license for a minimum of six months or until age 18 and maintained a record without any suspensions, revocations, or recalls for the six-month period preceding licensure under this section.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 195

, § 1;

1999, No. 140

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 607.
Junior operator’s license.

A junior operator’s license may be issued initially only to persons who:

are 16 and 17 years of age;

have passed the driver examination required in subchapter 2 of this chapter and a driver education and training course approved by the Commissioner of Motor Vehicles and the Secretary of Education;

have:

possessed a learner’s permit for not less than one year;

submitted on a form provided by the Department of Motor Vehicles that is approved by the Commissioner, and certified by the operator’s licensed parent or guardian, licensed or certified driver education instructor, or licensed person at least 25 years of age that there was at least 40 hours of practice behind the wheel, at least 10 of which was nighttime driving and that the operator was accompanied by his or her licensed parent or guardian, a licensed or certified driver education instructor, or another licensed individual at least 25 years of age, riding in the front passenger seat; and

maintained a driving record without a learner’s permit suspension, revocation, or recall for six consecutive months prior to licensure.

An applicant for a junior operator’s license shall not be given a license unless his or her parent, guardian, or a person standing in loco parentis to him or her files a written consent with the Commissioner.

Any junior operator’s license may be renewed. Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law, a renewed junior operator’s license shall not be required to meet the requirements of subsection 610(b) of this title.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 195

, § 1;

1966, No. 65

(Sp. Sess.), § 6;

1999, No. 140

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

2005, No. 90

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Feb. 24, 2006;

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 268, eff. Feb. 14, 2014;

2019, No. 60

, § 3.

§ 607a.
Recall of learner’s permit or junior operator’s license.

A learner’s permit or junior operator’s license shall contain an admonition that it is recallable and that the later procurement of an operator’s license is conditional on the establishment of a record that is satisfactory to the Commissioner and showing compliance with the motor vehicle laws of this and other states. The Commissioner may recall any permit or license issued to a minor whenever he or she is satisfied, from information provided by a credible person and upon investigation, that the operator is mentally or physically unfit or, because of his or her habits or record as to crashes or convictions, is unsafe to be trusted with the operation of motor vehicles. On recommendation of a diversion or reparative board, the Commissioner may recall the learner’s permit or junior operator’s license of a person in a diversion or reparative program for up to 30 days. The Commissioner shall also recall any learner’s permit or junior operator’s license for 30 days when an operator is adjudicated of a single texting violation under section 1099 of this title, 90 days following adjudication of a single speeding violation resulting in a three-point assessment, 90 days when a total of six points has been accumulated, or 90 days when an operator is adjudicated of a violation of subsection 614(c) or 615(a) of this title. When a learner’s permit or junior operator’s license is so recalled, it shall be reinstated upon expiration of a specific term and, if required by the Commissioner, when the person has passed a reexamination approved by the Commissioner.

When a license or permit is recalled under the provisions of this section, the person whose license or permit is so recalled shall have the same right of hearing before the Commissioner as is provided in subsection 671(a) of this title.

Except for a recall based solely upon the provisions of subsection (d) of this section, any recall of a license or permit may extend past the operator’s 18th birthday. While the recall is still in effect, that operator shall be ineligible for any operator’s license.

The Commissioner shall recall a learner’s permit or junior operator’s license upon written request of the individual’s custodial parent or guardian.

Any recall period under this section shall run concurrently with any suspension period imposed under chapter 13 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1959, No. 195

, §§ 1, 2; amended

1971, No. 184

(Adj. Sess.), § 8, eff. March 29, 1972;

1999, No. 140

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

2009, No. 150

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. June 1, 2010;

2013, No. 57

, § 9.

§ 608.
Fees.

The four-year fee required to be paid the Commissioner for licensing an operator of motor vehicles or for issuing an operator’s privilege card shall be $51.00. The two-year fee required to be paid the Commissioner for licensing an operator or for issuing an operator’s privilege card shall be $32.00, and the two-year fee for licensing a junior operator or for issuing a junior operator’s privilege card shall be $32.00.

An additional fee of $3.00 per year shall be paid for a motorcycle endorsement. The endorsement may be obtained for either a two-year or four-year period, to be coincidental with the length of the operator’s license.

HISTORY:

Amended

1965, No. 154

, § 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1965;

1967, No. 86

, § 2;

1975, No. 193

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

1981, No. 130

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

1989, No. 51

, § 35;

1989, No. 268

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. June 21, 1990;

2001, No. 102

(Adj. Sess.), § 21, eff. May 15, 2002;

2003, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 6;

2005, No. 175

(Adj. Sess.), § 34;

2009, No. 50

, § 46;

2011, No. 128

(Adj. Sess.), § 18;

2013, No. 189

(Adj. Sess.), § 9;

2015, No. 159

(Adj. Sess.), § 34.

§ 609.
Veterans’ exemption.

No fees shall be charged an honorably discharged veteran of the U.S. Armed Forces who is a resident of the State of Vermont for a license to operate a motor vehicle, when the veteran has acquired a motor vehicle with financial assistance from the U.S. Department of Veterans Affairs and he or she is otherwise eligible to be granted the license, and when his or her application is accompanied by a copy of an approved VA Form 21-4502 issued by the U.S. Department of Veterans Affairs certifying him or her to be entitled to the financial assistance.

HISTORY:

Amended

1975, No. 38

, § 2;

2017, No. 206

(Adj. Sess.), § 5.

§ 610.
License certificates.

The Commissioner shall assign a distinguishing number to each licensee and shall furnish the licensee with a license certificate that shows the number and the licensee’s full name, date of birth, and residential address, except that at the request of the licensee, the licensee’s mailing address may be listed, or an alternative address may be listed if otherwise authorized by law. The certificate also shall include a brief physical description and a space for the signature of the licensee. The license shall be void until signed by the licensee. If a veteran, as defined in 38 U.S.C. § 101(2), requests a veteran designation and provides proof of veteran status as specified in subdivision 603(a)(3) of this title, and the Office of Veterans Affairs confirms his or her status as an honorably discharged veteran or a veteran discharged under honorable conditions, the license certificate shall include the term “veteran” on its face.

A motor vehicle operator’s license issued to an individual who is under the age of 18 shall be distinguishable by color from a motor vehicle operator’s license issued to an individual who is over the age of 18 but under the age of 21, and both cards shall be distinguishable by color from a motor vehicle operator’s license issued to an individual 21 or older. A motor vehicle operator’s license issued to an individual under the age of 21 shall clearly indicate, in prominent type, the date on which the individual will become 21. The distinguishing colors shall be the same as those used to distinguish identification cards issued under section 115 of this title.

Each license certificate issued to a first-time applicant and each subsequent renewal by that individual shall be issued with the photograph or imaged likeness of the licensee included on the certificate. The Commissioner shall determine the locations where photographic licenses may be issued. An individual issued a license containing an imaged likeness under this subsection may renew by mail, except that a renewal by a licensee required to have a photograph or imaged likeness must be made in person so that an updated imaged likeness of the individual is obtained not less often than once every nine years.

Each license certificate issued to an initial or renewal applicant shall include a bar code with minimum data elements as prescribed in 6 C.F.R. § 37.19.

HISTORY:

Amended

1993, No. 212

(Adj. Sess.), § 9;

1999, No. 163

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

2003, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 7;

2013, No. 57

, § 15;

2019, No. 60

, § 4;

2021, No. 20

, § 235.

§§ 610a,
610b.
Repealed. 1999, No. 163 (Adj. Sess.), § 7.

§ 610c.
Legislative intent; existing driver’s licenses without photograph or imaged likeness.

It is the intent of the General Assembly that the provisions of subsection 610(c) of this title not require individuals who, prior to July 1, 2004, were issued a driver’s license without a photograph or imaged likeness to obtain a photograph or imaged likeness after that date.

HISTORY:

Added

2003, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 8; amended

2021, No. 20

, § 236.

§ 611.
Possession of license certificate.

Every licensee shall have his or her operator’s license certificate in his or her immediate possession at all times when operating a motor vehicle. However, a person cited with violating this section or section 610 of this title shall not be convicted if he or she sends a copy of or produces to the issuing enforcement agency within seven business days of the traffic stop an operator’s license certificate that was valid or had expired within 14 days prior to the traffic stop.

HISTORY:

Amended

1967, No. 356

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. March 27, 1968;

2011, No. 62

, § 37;

2013, No. 189

(Adj. Sess.), § 14.

§ 612.
Restricted license.

When issuing or reinstating the license of an operator, the Commissioner may restrict the privileges granted by such license to the operating of one or more specified motor vehicles or in such other manner as the Commissioner may deem best, and such restriction shall be endorsed on the license certificate.
A person holding a restricted license shall not operate a motor vehicle except as permitted in such restriction.

§ 613.
Replacement license.

In case of the loss, mutilation, or destruction of a license or error in a license, the licensee shall forthwith notify the Commissioner who shall furnish such licensee with a replacement on receipt of $20.00.

A replacement license shall not be issued to any person who has surrendered his or her license to another jurisdiction in connection with obtaining a license in that jurisdiction.

HISTORY:

Amended

1969, No. 276

(Adj. Sess.), § 7;

1987, No. 62

, § 4;

1987, No. 241

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

1989, No. 51

, § 37;

2001, No. 102

(Adj. Sess.), § 22, eff. May 15, 2002;

2003, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 9;

2015, No. 159

(Adj. Sess.), § 35;

2019, No. 60

, § 10.

§ 614.
Rights under license.

An operator’s license shall entitle the holder to operate a registered motor vehicle with the consent of the owner whether employed to do so or not.

A junior operator’s license shall entitle the holder to operate a registered motor vehicle with the consent of the owner, but shall not entitle him or her to operate a motor vehicle in the course of his or her employment or for direct or indirect compensation for one year following issuance of the license, except that the holder may operate a farm tractor with or without compensation upon a public highway in going to and from different parts of a farm of the tractor’s owner or to go to any repair shop for repair purposes. A junior operator’s license shall not entitle the holder to carry passengers for hire.

During the first three months of operation, the holder of a junior operator’s license is restricted to driving alone or with a licensed parent or guardian, licensed or certified driver education instructor, or licensed person at least 25 years of age. During the following three months, a junior operator may additionally transport family members. No person operating with a junior operator’s license shall transport more passengers than there are safety belts unless he or she is operating a vehicle that has not been manufactured with a federally approved safety belt system. A person convicted of operating a motor vehicle in violation of this subsection shall be subject to a penalty of not more than $50.00, and his or her license shall be recalled for a period of 90 days. The provisions of this subsection may be enforced only if a law enforcement officer has detained the operator for another suspected traffic violation.

A nonresident under 18 years of age who is privileged to operate on Vermont highways under section 208 of this title shall be subject to the restrictions of subsections (b) and (c) of this section.

HISTORY:

Amended

1967, No. 361

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

1999, No. 140

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

2013, No. 57

, § 10;

2013, No. 189

(Adj. Sess.), § 7;

2015, No. 47

, § 40;

2015, No. 158

(Adj. Sess.), § 64.

§ 615.
Unlicensed operators.

An unlicensed person 15 years of age or older may operate a motor vehicle if he or she possesses a valid learner’s permit issued to him or her by the Commissioner, or by another jurisdiction in accordance with section 208 of this title, and if one of the following persons who is not under the influence of alcohol or drugs rides beside him or her:
(a) (1) (A) An unlicensed person 15 years of age or older may operate a motor vehicle if he or she possesses a valid learner’s permit issued to him or her by the Commissioner, or by another jurisdiction in accordance with section 208 of this title, and if one of the following persons who is not under the influence of alcohol or drugs rides beside him or her:

his or her licensed parent or guardian;

a licensed or certified driver education instructor;

a licensed examiner of the Department; or

a licensed person at least 25 years of age.

A person described under subdivisions (A)(i)-(iv) of this subdivision (1) who, while under the influence of alcohol or drugs, rides beside an individual whom the person knows to be unlicensed shall be subject to the same penalties as for a violation of subsection 1130(b) of this title. A holder of a learner’s permit shall not be deemed to have violated this section if a person described under subdivisions (A)(i)-(iv) of this subdivision (1) rides beside him or her while the person is under the influence of alcohol or drugs.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to permit a person against whom a revocation or suspension of license is in force, or a person younger than 15 years of age, or a person who has been refused a license by the Commissioner to operate a motor vehicle.

A licensed person who does not possess a valid motorcycle endorsement may operate a motorcycle, with no passengers, only during daylight hours and then only if he or she has upon his or her person a valid motorcycle learner’s permit issued to him or her by the Commissioner.

A person convicted of operating a motor vehicle in violation of this section shall be subject to a penalty of not more than $50.00, and his or her learner’s permit shall be recalled for a period of 90 days. No person may be issued traffic complaints alleging a violation of this section and a violation of section 676 of this title from the same incident. The provisions of this section may be enforced only if a law enforcement officer has detained the operator for another suspected traffic violation.

HISTORY:

Amended

1961, No. 133

;

1963, No. 139

, eff. Aug. 1, 1963;

1983, No. 42

, § 1;

1999, No. 140

(Adj. Sess.), § 5;

2013, No. 57

, § 11;

2013, No. 189

(Adj. Sess.), § 6;

2015, No. 47

, § 41;

2015, No. 158

(Adj. Sess.), § 64;

2017, No. 71

, § 11.

§ 616.
Extension of license for members of U.S. Armed Forces and immediate family members.

Definition. As used in this section, “immediate family member” means a child; stepchild; foster child; spouse; domestic partner, as defined in

17 V.S.A. § 2414

; civil union partner; parent; or parent of a spouse, domestic partner, or civil union partner.

Members of the U.S. Armed Forces.

A resident of Vermont who is a member of the U.S. Armed Forces and who at the time of his or her induction or enlistment into the U.S. Armed Forces, or who during his or her term of service with the U.S. Armed Forces was the holder of a valid Vermont license to operate motor vehicles issued by the Commissioner, shall, notwithstanding the expiration of the license, be entitled to operate a motor vehicle with that expired license during his or her term of service and until 30 days after receiving a discharge from the U.S. Armed Forces, but not to exceed four years from the date of expiration of his or her license.

A resident of Vermont who is a member of the Reserve Component of the U.S. Armed Forces and who at the time he or she is called to active duty was the holder of a valid Vermont license to operate motor vehicles issued by the Commissioner shall, notwithstanding the expiration of such license, be entitled to operate a motor vehicle with that expired license during his or her term of active duty and until 30 days after being released from active duty, but not to exceed four years from the date of expiration of his or her license.

Immediate family members of members of the U.S. Armed Forces.

A resident of Vermont who is absent from the State because his or her immediate family member is serving with the U.S. Armed Forces and who had a valid Vermont license to operate motor vehicles issued by the Commissioner at the time of the immediate family member’s induction or enlistment into the U.S. Armed Forces shall, notwithstanding the expiration of the license, be entitled to operate a motor vehicle with that expired license during the immediate family member’s term of service and until 30 days after his or her immediate family member is discharged from the U.S. Armed Forces, but not to exceed four years from the date of expiration of his or her license.

A resident of Vermont who is absent from the State because his or her immediate family member is a member of the Reserve Component of the U.S. Armed Forces who had a valid Vermont license to operate motor vehicles issued by the Commissioner at the time of the immediate family member’s call to active duty shall, notwithstanding the expiration of such license, be entitled to operate a motor vehicle with that expired license during his or her immediate family member’s term of active duty and until 30 days after his or her immediate family is released from active duty, but not to exceed four years from the date of expiration of his or her license.

Proof required. Any member of the U.S. Armed Forces or immediate family member of a member of the U.S. Armed Forces operating a motor vehicle with an expired license pursuant to subsection (b) or (c) shall, while operating a motor vehicle, carry the last license issued to him or her and conclusive evidence that he or she is a member of the U.S. Armed Forces or the immediate family member of a member of the U.S. Armed Forces and, if the member of the U.S. Armed Forces is discharged or released from active duty, a copy of the applicable DD-214 or similar document of discharge or release from active duty.

Effect of revocation, suspension, or refusal. Nothing in this section shall be construed to permit an individual against whom a revocation or suspension of license has been issued or is in force, or an individual who has been refused a license by the Commissioner, to operate a motor vehicle.

HISTORY:

Amended

2019, No. 149

(Adj. Sess.), § 7, eff. July 13, 2020.